Arkansas, session 2025, HB1843.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 12-12-312(a)(1)(A)(ii), concerning the
release of confidential and privileged records by the State Crime Laboratory
to certain persons, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as
follows:
(e) The Arkansas Drug Director.













*CRH211*
03/18/2025 9:46:32 AM CRH211